California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(D) The state shall not make any change to the structure of financing mental health services, which increases a county’s share of costs or financial risk for mental health services unless the state includes adequate funding to fully compensate for such increased costs or financial risk.

(E) These funds shall only be used to pay for the programs authorized in Sections 5890 and 5892. These funds may not be used to pay for any other program.

(F) These funds may not be loaned to the General Fund or any other fund of the state, or a county general fund or any other county fund for any purpose other than those authorized by Sections 5890 and 5892.

(2) To maximize federal financial participation in furtherance of subdivision (d) of Section
 5890, a county shall submit claims for reimbursement to the State Department of Health Care Services in accordance with applicable Medi-Cal rules and procedures for a behavioral health service or supportive service eligible for reimbursement pursuant to Title XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396, et seq. and 1397aa, et seq.) when such service is paid, in whole or in part, using the funding established pursuant to this act.

(3) (A) To maximize funding from other sources, a county shall seek reimbursement for a behavioral health service, supportive service, housing intervention, or other related activity provided, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892, that is covered by or can be paid from another available funding source, including other mental health funds, substance use disorder funds, public and private insurance, and other local, state, and federal funds. This paragraph does not
 require counties to exhaust other funding sources before using Behavioral Health Service Fund moneys to pay for a service-related activity.

(B) A county shall make a good faith effort to enter into contracts, single case agreements, or other agreements to obtain reimbursement with health care service plans and disability insurance plans, pursuant to Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.5 of the Insurance Code.

(C) A county shall also submit requests for prior authorization for services, request letters of agreement for payment as an out-of-network provider, and pursue other means to obtain reimbursement in accordance with state and federal laws.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and except as provided in paragraph (2), the Controller may use the funds created
 pursuant to this part for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be repaid from the General Fund with interest computed at 110 percent of the Pooled Money Investment Account rate, with interest commencing to accrue on the date the loan is made from the fund. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount created by subdivision (f) of Section 5890 or any moneys paid by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority to the Department of Housing and Community Development as a service fee pursuant to a service contract authorized by Section 5849.35.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2012, on or before the 15th day of each month, pursuant to a
 methodology provided by the State Department of Health Care Services, the Controller shall distribute to each Local Mental Health Service Fund established by counties pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5892, all unexpended and unreserved funds on deposit as of the last day of the prior month in the Behavioral Health Services Fund, established pursuant to Section 5890, for the provision of programs and other related activities set forth in Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.2 (commencing with Section 5830), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850).

(d) (1) Counties shall base their expenditures on the county mental health program’s three-year program and expenditure plan or annual update, as required by Section 5847.

(2) This subdivision does not affect
 subdivision (a) or (b).

(e) This act shall not be construed to modify or reduce a health plan’s obligations under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975.

(f) This section shall become operative immediately if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(g) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 89) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 47.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 90 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5891.

(a) (1) (A) The funding established pursuant to this act shall be utilized by counties to expand mental health and substance use disorder treatment services.

(B) These funds shall not be used to supplant existing state or county funds utilized to provide mental health services or substance use disorder treatment services.

(C) The state shall continue to provide financial support for mental health and substance use disorder programs with not less than the same entitlements, amounts of allocations from the General Fund or from the Local Revenue Fund 2011 in the State
 Treasury, and formula distributions of dedicated funds as provided in the last fiscal year which ended prior to the effective date of this act.

(D) The state shall not make a change to the structure of financing mental health and substance use disorder treatment services that increases a county’s share of costs or financial risk for behavioral health services unless the state includes adequate funding to fully compensate for such increased costs or financial risk.

(E) These funds shall only be used to pay for the programs authorized in Sections 5890 and 5892.

(F) These funds may not be used to pay for another program.

(G) These funds may not be loaned
 to the General Fund or another fund of the state, a county general fund, or another county fund for any purpose other than those authorized by Sections 5890 and 5892.

(2) To maximize federal financial participation in furtherance of subdivision (d) of Section 5890, a county shall submit claims for reimbursement to the State Department of Health Care Services in accordance with applicable Medi-Cal rules and procedures for a behavioral health service or supportive service eligible for reimbursement pursuant to Title XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396, et seq. and 1397aa, et seq.) when such service is paid, in whole or in part, using the funding established pursuant to this act.

(3) (A) To maximize funding from other sources, a county
 shall seek reimbursement for a behavioral health service, supportive service, housing intervention, or other related activity provided, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892, that is covered by or can be paid from another available funding source, including other mental health funds, substance use disorder funds, public and private insurance, and other local, state, and federal funds. This paragraph does not require counties to exhaust other funding sources before using behavioral health services fund moneys to pay for a service or related activity.

(B) A county shall make a good faith effort to enter into contracts, single case agreements, or other agreements to obtain reimbursement with health care service plans and disability insurance plans, pursuant to Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.5 of the
 Insurance Code.

(C) A county shall also submit requests for prior authorization for services, request letters of agreement for payment as an out-of-network provider, and pursue other means to obtain reimbursement in accordance with state and federal laws.

(4) (A) A county may report to the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, as appropriate, complaints about a health plan’s or a health insurer’s failure to make a good faith effort to contract or enter into a single case agreement or other agreement with the county.

(B) A county may also report to the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, respectively, a failure by a health plan or
 insurer to timely reimburse the county for services the plan or insurer must cover as required by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, Sections 1374.72 and 1374.721 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 10144.5 and 10144.52 of the Insurance Code.

(C) Upon receipt of a complaint from a county, the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, as applicable, shall timely investigate the complaint.

(b) (1) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and except as provided in paragraph (2), the Controller may use the funds created pursuant to this part for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(B) Those
 loans shall be repaid from the General Fund with interest computed at 110 percent of the Pooled Money Investment Account rate, with interest commencing to accrue on the date the loan is made from the fund.

(C) This subdivision does not authorize a transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount created by subdivision (f) of Section 5890 or moneys paid by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority to the Department of Housing and Community Development as a service fee pursuant to a service contract authorized by Section 5849.35.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2012, on or before the
 15th day of each month, pursuant to a methodology provided by the State Department of Health Care Services, the Controller shall distribute to each Local Behavioral Health Service Fund established by counties, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5892, all unexpended and unreserved funds on deposit as of the last day of the prior month in the Behavioral Health Services Fund, established pursuant to Section 5890, for the provision of programs and other related activities set forth in Section 5892.

(d) (1) A county shall base its expenditures on the county mental health and substance use disorder program’s integrated plan or annual update as required by Section 5963.02 or intermittent update pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5963.03.

(2) This
 subdivision does not affect subdivision (a) or (b).

(e) Each year, the State Department of Health Care Services shall post on its internet website the methodology used for allocating revenue from the Behavioral Health Service Fund to the counties.

(f) For purposes of this section, “behavioral health services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5892.

(g) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(h) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder treatment services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(i) For purposes of this section, “supportive services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 5887.

(j) This act shall not be construed to modify or reduce a health plan’s obligations under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975.

(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 89) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 90.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5891.5.

(a) (1) The programs in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5890 may include substance use disorder treatment for children, adults, and older adults with cooccurring mental health and substance use disorders who are eligible to receive mental health services pursuant to those programs. The MHSA includes persons with a serious mental disorder and a diagnosis of substance abuse in the definition of persons who are eligible for MHSA services in Sections 5878.2 and 5813.5, which reference paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3.

(2) Provision of substance use disorder treatment services pursuant to this
 section shall comply with all applicable requirements of the Mental Health Services Act.

(3) Treatment of cooccurring mental health and substance use disorders shall be identified in a county’s three-year program and expenditure plan or annual update, as required by Section 5847.

(b) (1) When a person being treated for cooccurring mental health and substance use disorders pursuant to subdivision (a) is determined to not need the mental health services that are eligible for funding pursuant to the MHSA, the county shall refer the person receiving treatment to substance use disorder treatment services in a timely manner.

(2) Funding established pursuant to the MHSA may be used to assess whether a
 person has cooccurring mental health and substance use disorders and to treat a person who is preliminarily assessed to have cooccurring mental health and substance use disorders, even when the person is later determined not to be eligible for services provided with funding established pursuant to the MHSA.

(c) A county shall report to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, both of the following:

(1) The number of people assessed for cooccurring mental health and substance use disorders.

(2) The number of people assessed for cooccurring mental health and substance use disorders who were ultimately determined to have only a substance use disorder without another cooccurring mental health
 condition.

(d) The department shall by January 1, 2022, and each January 1 thereafter, publish on its internet website a report summarizing county activities pursuant to this section for the prior fiscal year. Data shall be reported statewide and by county or groupings of counties, as necessary to protect the private health information of persons assessed.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(2) On or before July 1, 2025, the department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are
 approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 91.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 92 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5891.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the programs and services and supports in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892 may include substance use disorder treatment services, as defined in this section for children, youth, adults, and older adults.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 5830, the provision of housing interventions to individuals with a substance use disorder shall be optional for counties.

(3) Counties that provide substance use disorder treatment services shall provide all forms of federal Food and Drug Administration approved medications for addiction
 treatment.

(4) Funding established pursuant to the Behavioral Health Services Act may be used to assess whether a person has a substance use disorder and to treat a person prior to a diagnosis of a substance use disorder, even when the person is later determined not to be eligible for services provided with funding established pursuant to the Behavioral Health Services Act.

(5) Substance use disorder treatment services shall be identified in a county’s integrated plan or annual update, as required by Section 5963.02.

(b) (1) A county shall report to the department data and information regarding implementation of this section specified by the department.

(2) The data and information shall be reported in a form, manner, and frequency determined by the department.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder” means an adult, child, or youth who has at least one diagnosis of a moderate or severe substance use disorder from the most current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders for Substance-Related and Addictive Disorders, with the exception of tobacco-related disorders and non-substance-related disorders.

(2) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder treatment services” include harm reduction, treatment, and recovery services, including federal Food and Drug Administration approved medications.

(d) (1) The department shall, by January 1, 2022, and each January 1 thereafter, publish on its internet website a report summarizing county activities pursuant to this section for the prior fiscal year.

(2) Data shall be reported statewide and by county or groupings of counties, as necessary to protect the private health information of persons assessed.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 91) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 92.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.

(a) To promote efficient implementation of this act, the county shall use funds distributed from the Behavioral Health Services Fund as follows:

(1) Twenty percent of funds distributed to the counties pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 shall be used for prevention and early intervention programs in accordance with Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840).

(2) The expenditure for prevention and early intervention may be increased in a county in which the department determines that the increase will decrease the need and cost for additional services to persons with severe mental illness in that county by an amount at least commensurate with the proposed increase.

(3) The balance of funds shall be distributed to county mental health programs for services to persons with severe mental illnesses pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) for the children’s system of care and Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) for the adult and older adult system of care. These services may include housing assistance, as defined in Section 5892.5, to the target population specified in Section 5600.3.

(4) Five percent of the total funding for each county mental health program for Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) shall be utilized for innovative programs in accordance with Sections 5830, 5847, and 5963.03.

(b) (1) Programs for services pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section
 5800) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) may include funds for technological needs and capital facilities, human resource needs, and a prudent reserve to ensure services do not have to be significantly reduced in years in which revenues are below the average of previous years. The total allocation for purposes authorized by this subdivision shall not exceed 20 percent of the average amount of funds allocated to that county for the previous five fiscal years pursuant to this section.

(2) A county shall calculate a maximum amount it establishes as the prudent reserve for its Local Behavioral Health Services Fund, not to exceed 33 percent of the average of the total funds distributed to the county pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 in the preceding five years.

(3) A county with a population of less than 200,000 shall calculate a maximum amount it establishes as the
 prudent reserve for its Local Behavioral Health Services Fund, not to exceed 25 percent of the average of the total funds distributed to the county pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 in the preceding five years.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5891, the allocations pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall include funding for annual planning costs pursuant to Sections 5847 and 5963.03. The total of these costs shall not exceed 5 percent of the total of annual revenues received for the Local Behavioral Health Services Fund. The planning costs shall include funds for county mental health programs to pay for the costs of consumers, family members, and other stakeholders to participate in the planning process and for the planning and implementation required for private provider contracts to be significantly expanded to provide additional services pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) and Part 4 (commencing with
 Section 5850).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5891, the allocations pursuant to subdivision (a) may include funding to improve plan operations, quality outcomes, fiscal and programmatic data reporting, and monitoring of subcontractor compliance for all county behavioral health programs, including, but not limited to, programs administered by a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101, and programs funded by the Projects for Assistance in Transition from Homelessness grant, the Community Mental Health Services Block Grant, and other Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration grants.

(2) The total of these costs shall not exceed 2 percent of the total of annual revenues received for the Local Behavioral Health Services Fund.

(3) A county may commence use of funding pursuant to this paragraph on July 1, 2025.

(e) (1) (A) Prior to making the allocations pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), funds shall be reserved for state directed purposes for the California Health and Human Services Agency, the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, the Department of Health Care Access and Information, the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, the State Department of Public Health, and any other state agency.

(B) These costs shall not exceed 5 percent of the total of annual revenues received for the fund.

(C) The costs shall include funds to assist consumers
 and family members to ensure the appropriate state and county agencies give full consideration to concerns about quality, structure of service delivery, or access to services.

(D) The amounts allocated for state directed purposes shall include amounts sufficient to ensure adequate research and evaluation regarding the effectiveness of services being provided and achievement of the outcome measures set forth in Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850).

(E) The amount of funds available for the purposes of this subdivision in any fiscal year is subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(2) Prior to making the allocations pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), funds shall be reserved for the costs of the Department of
 Health Care Access and Information to administer a behavioral health workforce initiative in collaboration with the California Health and Human Services Agency. Funding for this purpose shall not exceed thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000). The amount of funds available for the purposes of this subdivision in any fiscal year is subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(f) Each county shall place all funds received from the State Behavioral Health Services Fund in a local Mental Health Services Fund. The Local Mental Health Services Fund balance shall be invested consistent with other county funds and the interest earned on the investments shall be transferred into the fund. The earnings on investment of these funds shall be available for distribution from the fund in future fiscal years.

(g) All expenditures for county mental health programs shall be consistent with
 a currently approved plan or update pursuant to Section 5847.

(h) (1) Other than funds placed in a reserve in accordance with an approved plan, any funds allocated to a county that have not been spent for their authorized purpose within three years, and the interest accruing on those funds, shall revert to the state to be deposited into the Reversion Account, hereby established in the fund, and available for other counties in future years, provided, however, that funds, including interest accrued on those funds, for capital facilities, technological needs, or education and training may be retained for up to 10 years before reverting to the Reversion Account.

(2) (A) If a county receives approval from the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission of a plan for innovative programs, pursuant to subdivision (e) of
 Section 5830, the county’s funds identified in that plan for innovative programs shall not revert to the state pursuant to paragraph (1) so long as they are encumbered under the terms of the approved project plan, including any subsequent amendments approved by the commission, or until three years after the date of approval, whichever is later.

(B) Subparagraph (A) applies to all plans for innovative programs that have received commission approval and are in the process at the time of enactment of the act that added this subparagraph, and to all plans that receive commission approval thereafter.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), funds allocated to a county with a population of less than 200,000 that have not been spent for their authorized purpose within five years shall revert to the state as described in paragraph (1).

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if a county with a population of less than 200,000 receives approval from the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission of a plan for innovative programs, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5830, the county’s funds identified in that plan for innovative programs shall not revert to the state pursuant to paragraph (1) so long as they are encumbered under the terms of the approved project plan, including any subsequent amendments approved by the commission, or until five years after the date of approval, whichever is later.

(B) Subparagraph (A) applies to all plans for innovative programs that have received commission approval and are in the process at the time of enactment of the act that added this subparagraph, and to all plans that receive commission approval thereafter.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) and Section 5892.1, unspent funds allocated to a county, and interest accruing on those funds, which are subject to reversion as of July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2020, shall be subject to reversion on July 1, 2021.

(j) If there are revenues available in the fund after the State Department of Health Care Services has determined there are prudent reserves and no unmet needs for any of the programs funded pursuant to this section, the department, in consultation with counties, shall develop a plan for expenditures of these revenues to further the purposes of this act and the Legislature may appropriate these funds for any purpose consistent with the department’s plan that furthers the purposes of this act.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters
 at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(l) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 48) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 18.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 64 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 27.    Note: Amended in Prop. 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.

(a) To promote efficient implementation of this act, subject to subdivision (c), the county shall use funds distributed from the Behavioral Health Services Fund as follows:

(1) (A) (i) Thirty percent of funds distributed to the counties pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 shall be used for housing interventions programs pursuant to Part 3.2 (commencing with Section 5830).

(ii) Of the funds distributed pursuant to clause (i), 50 percent shall be used for housing interventions for persons who are chronically homeless, with a focus on those in encampments.

(iii) Of the funds distributed to
 pursuant clause (i), no more than 25 percent may be used for capital development projects pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5830.

(B) Commencing with the 2026–29 fiscal years’ county integrated plan, pursuant to Section 5963.02, and ongoing thereafter, for counties with a population of less than 200,000, the State Department of Health Care Services shall establish criteria and a process for approving county requests for an exemption from subparagraph (A) that considers factors including a county’s homeless population, the number of individuals receiving Medi-Cal specialty behavioral health services or substance use disorder treatment services in another county, and other factors as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall collaborate with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California on
 reasonable criteria for those requests and a timely and efficient exemption process. Requests for approval of an exemption under this subparagraph shall be responded to, approved, or denied within 30 days of receipt by the department, or shall otherwise be deemed approved by the department.

(C) Commencing with the 2032–35 fiscal years’ county integrated plan, pursuant to Section 5963.02, and ongoing thereafter, the State Department of Health Care Services may establish criteria and a process for approving county requests for an exemption from subparagraph (A) that considers the factors set forth in subparagraph (B), regardless of the population size of the county. The State Department of Health Care Services shall collaborate with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California on reasonable criteria for those requests and a timely and efficient exemption process.

(2) (A) Thirty-five percent of the funds distributed to counties pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 shall be used for full-service partnership programs pursuant to Part 4.1 (commencing with Section 5887).

(B) Commencing with the 2032–35 fiscal years’ county integrated plan, pursuant to Section 5963.02, and ongoing thereafter, the State Department of Health Care Services may establish criteria and a process for approving requests for an exemption from subparagraph (A) that considers factors such as county population, client counts, and other factors as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall collaborate with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California on reasonable criteria for those requests and a timely and
 efficient exemption process.

(C) Housing interventions provided to individuals enrolled in full-service partnership programs shall be funded pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(3) (A) Thirty-five percent of the funds distributed to counties pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 shall be used for the following Behavioral Health Services and Supports:

(i) Services pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) for the children’s system of care and Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) for the adult and older adult system of care, excluding those services specified in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(ii) Early intervention programs in accordance with Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840).

(iii) Outreach and engagement.

(iv) Workforce education and training.

(v) Capital facilities and technological needs.

(vi) Innovative behavioral health pilots and projects.

(B) (i) A county shall utilize at least 51 percent of Behavioral Health Services and Supports funding for early intervention programs.

(ii) A county shall utilize at least 51 percent of the county’s funding allocated for early intervention programs to serve individuals who are 25 years of age and younger.

(iii) A county shall comply with other funding allocations specified
 by the State Department of Health Care Services for the purposes listed in subparagraph (A).

(4) (A) A county may pilot and test innovative behavioral health models of care programs or innovative promising practices for the programs specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3).

(B) The goal of these innovative pilots and innovative promising practices is to build the evidence base for the effectiveness of new statewide strategies.

(5) The programs established pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) shall include services to address the needs of eligible children and youth, 0 to 5 years of age, inclusive, transition age youth, and foster youth.

(6) A county is only obligated to fund the programs established pursuant to paragraphs
 (1) to (4), inclusive, with the funds it receives pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891.

(b) (1) A county shall establish and maintain a prudent reserve to ensure county programs are able to continue to meet the needs of children and youth, adults, and older adults participating in housing intervention programs pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), full-service partnership programs pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and receiving services pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), and (vi) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), during fiscal years in which the conditions described in subdivision (c) of Section 5892.2 occur.

(2) Notwithstanding the allocation percentages specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a), a county may transfer funds into the prudent reserve from housing intervention programs pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), full-service partnership programs pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and Behavioral Health Services and Supports pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(3) A county shall calculate a maximum
 funding level for its prudent reserve for its Local Behavioral Health Services Fund, not to exceed 20 percent of the average of the total funds distributed to the county pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 in the preceding five years.

(4) A county with a population of less than 200,000 shall calculate a maximum funding level for its prudent reserve for its Local Behavioral Health Services Fund, not to exceed 25 percent of the average of the total funds distributed to the county pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 in the preceding five years.

(5) (A) A county shall assess the maximum
 funding level amount of its prudent reserve pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) by June 30, 2026, and every three years thereafter and shall include a plan for the expenditure of funds exceeding the maximum
 funding level amount in the county’s integrated plan required pursuant to Section 5963.02.

(B) A county shall spend funds exceeding the maximum
 funding level for its prudent reserve on programs and services authorized in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) and shall comply with the allocation percentages specified in subdivision (a).

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), for funds exceeding the maximum funding level of a county’s prudent reserve identified pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), both of the following apply:

(i) The county is not required to comply with the allocation percentages specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of,
 or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of, subdivision (a).

(ii) A county shall comply with the allocation percentages specified in clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of, subdivision (a).

(6) (A) A county shall spend prudent reserve funds on the programs and services authorized in paragraphs (1) and (2) of,
 and clauses (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), and (vi) of paragraph (3) of, subdivision (a).

(B) A county shall not spend prudent reserve funds for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5830.

(C) The reversion period specified in subdivision (i) begins the fiscal year a county transfers funds from the county’s local prudent reserve to one of the purposes authorized in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) A county may
 transfer up to 14 percent of the total funds allocated to the county in a fiscal year between one or more of the purposes authorized in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) of subdivision (a). A county shall not decrease the allocation for any one of the purposes authorized in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) by more than 7 percent of the total funds allocated to the county in a fiscal year. County changes to the allocation percentages specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) shall be subject to the approval of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) A county changing its allocation percentages pursuant to this subdivision does not relieve the county from the obligation to comply with any applicable laws, including, but not limited to, clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), and paragraphs (3) and (5), of subdivision (a).

(3) A county shall
 include proposed changes to the allocation percentages in the county integrated plan pursuant to Section 5963.02, and shall consult with local stakeholders pursuant to Section 5963.03.
